District of Columbia statutes.
46-205

Contents of support order.

All support orders, whether they are original orders or modifications of existing orders, shall contain the following:

(1)

A provision requiring the withholding of support payments from the obligor’s earnings or other income in accordance with this subchapter;

(2)

Notice that the support order shall be enforceable by withholding as specified in §§ 46-207 and 46-207.01;

(3)

Notice that payments required by a support order specified in § 46-202.01(b) shall be made through the Collection and Disbursement Unit and any other payments shall be considered a gift and shall not offset the duty of support;

(4)

A provision that directs the parties to file and update the information specified in § 46-226.02 with the IV-D agency and the Court in accordance with that section;

(5)

Terms providing for the payment of the child’s medical expenses, whether or not health insurance is available to pay for those expenses, which shall include a provision directing the obligor and obligee to notify the IV-D agency and the Court of the following:

(A)

Any change in either the obligor’s or the obligee’s access to health insurance coverage for the child or the reasonableness of the costs of coverage; and

(B)

All health insurance policy information necessary to enroll the child in the health insurance to which the obligor or obligee has access;

(6)

Notice that if the obligor is required under the support order to provide health insurance coverage for a child, the obligor’s employer will, upon receipt of notice of the health insurance coverage provision, enroll the child in health insurance coverage and deduct the premiums from the obligor’s earnings in accordance with §§ 1-307.41, 1-307.42, and subchapter II of this chapter;

(7)

Notice that the amount and name of the obligor and obligee of all support orders entered, modified, registered, or enforced in the District after December 23, 1997 shall be reported to a consumer credit reporting agency if the obligor owes overdue support in the amount of $1,000 or more;

(8)

The name, address, and telephone number of the obligor’s current employer; and

(9)

Notice that an order to withhold may be changed upon a motion by a party or the IV-D agency for a reapportionment of periodic arrears payments pursuant to § 46-208(c).

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 6, 33 DCR 6710
July 25, 1990, D.C. Law 8-150, § 4(a), 37 DCR 3720
Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-217, § 2(a), 41 DCR 8040
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 32, 43 DCR 530
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-170, § 2(a), 43 DCR 4480
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-269, § 108(d), 48 DCR 1270
Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-130, § 203(b), 51 DCR 1615
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3403(c), 51 DCR 8441
May 12, 2006, D.C. Law 16-100, § 3(c), 53 DCR 1886

History

1981 Ed., § 30-505.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-269 rewrote the section which had read:
“All Court orders or decrees directing the payment of child or spousal and child support, whether they are original orders or modifications of existing orders, shall contain the following information in addition to the notice required by § 46-206:
“(1) For an original support order or modification of a support order that is effective on or after January 1, 1994, notice that support payments shall be withheld from earnings or other income immediately, unless the Court finds there is good cause not to impose immediate withholding or the parties agree in writing to an alternative method of payment;
“(1A) In the case of a support order that is issued or modified on or after November 1, 1990, a finding of good cause not to require immediate withholding shall be based on at least:
“(A) A written explanation by the court of why immediate wage withholding would not be in the best interest of the child; and
“(B) If the modification of a support order is at issue, a written explanation that there is proof of timely payment of previously ordered support obligations;
“(2) Notice that if withholding commences, all payments shall be made through the Court registry and any other payments shall be considered a gift and shall not offset the duty of support ordered by the Court; and
“(3) A provision that directs the absent parent to keep the IV-D Program informed of the absent parent’s current employer, and whether the parent has access to health coverage at a reasonable cost and, if so, the health policy information.”
D.C. Law 15-130 rewrote par. (5) which had read:
“(5) Notice that if the obligor provides health insurance coverage for the child and changes to another employer that provides health care coverage, the IV-D agency or the Collection and Disbursement Unit will notify the new employer of the health insurance coverage provision in the support order, and that receipt of the notice by the employer shall operate to enroll the child in the obligor’s health plan with his new employer, unless the obligor contests the notice in accordance with rules adopted by the Mayor or the Superior Court, as appropriate; and”
D.C. Law 15-205, in pars. (3) and (4), substituted “Court” for “Collection and Disbursement Unit”; in par. (5), validated a previously made technical correction; and rewrote par. (6) which had read as follows: “(6) Notice that the amount and name of the obligor and obligee of all support orders entered, modified, registered, or enforced in the District after December 23, 1997 shall be reported to a consumer credit reporting agency if the obligor’s support obligations are over 30 days past due.”
D.C. Law 16-100 rewrote the section, which had read:
“All support orders, whether they are original orders or modifications of existing orders, shall contain the following information in addition to the notice required by § 46-206:
“(1) For an original support order or modification of a support order that is effective on or after January 1, 1994, notice that support payments shall be withheld from earnings or other income immediately, unless the Court finds there is good cause not to impose immediate withholding or the parties agree in writing to an alternative method of payment;
“(1A) In the case of a support order that is issued or modified on or after November 1, 1990, notice that a finding of good cause not to require immediate withholding shall be based on at least:
“(A) A written explanation by the court of why immediate wage withholding would not be in the best interest of the child; and
“(B) If the modification of a support order is at issue, a written explanation that there is proof of timely payment of previously ordered support obligations;
“(2) Notice that if withholding commences, all payments shall be made through the Collection and Disbursement Unit and any other payments shall be considered a gift and shall not offset the duty of support ordered by the Court;
“(3) A provision that directs the parties to file and update with the IV-D agency and with the Court the information required by § 46-226.02;
“(4) Terms providing for the payment of the child’s medical expenses, whether or not health insurance is available to pay for those expenses, which shall include a provision directing the obligor and obligee to notify the IV-D agency and the Court of the following:
“(A) Any change in either the obligor’s or the obligee’s access to health insurance coverage for the child or the reasonableness of the costs of coverage; and
“(B) All health insurance policy information necessary to enroll the child in the health insurance to which the obligor or obligee has access;
“(5) Notice that if the obligor is required under the support order to provide health insurance coverage for a child, the obligor’s employer will, upon receipt of notice of the health insurance coverage provision, enroll the child in health insurance coverage and deduct the premiums from the obligor’s earnings in accordance with §§ 1-307.41, 1-307.42, and subchapter II of this chapter.
“(6) Notice that the amount and name of the obligor and obligee of all support orders entered, modified, registered, or enforced in the District after December 23, 1997 shall be reported to a consumer credit reporting agency if the obligor owes overdue support in the amount of $1000 or more.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Child Support Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-210, March 14, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1526).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Child Support Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-47, September 20, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 5506).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Child Support Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-148, May 20, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 4353).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(b) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-210, April 13, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3832).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(d) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-57, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1979).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 107(d) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-207, March 31, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3238).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-238, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2751).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-84, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3376).
Section 3(d) of D.C. Law 16-42 rewrote section to read as follows:
“Sec. 6. Contents of support order.
“All support orders, whether they are original orders or modifications of existing orders, shall contain the following:
“(1) A provision requiring the withholding of support payments from the obligor’s earnings or other income in accordance with this act;
“(2) Notice that the support order shall be enforceable by withholding as specified in sections 8 and 8a;
“(3) Notice that payments required by a support order specified in section 3a(b) shall be made through the Collection and Disbursement Unit and any other payments shall be considered a gift and shall not offset the duty of support;
“(4) A provision that directs the parties to file and update the information specified in section 27b with the IV-D agency and the Court in accordance with that section;
“(5) Terms providing for the payment of the child’s medical expenses, whether or not health insurance is available to pay for those expenses, which shall include a provision directing the obligor and obligee to notify the IV-D agency and the Court of the following:
“(A) Any change in either the obligor’s or the obligee’s access to health insurance coverage for the child or the reasonableness of the costs of coverage; and
“(B) All health insurance policy information necessary to enroll the child in the health insurance to which the obligor or obligee has access;
“(6) Notice that if the obligor is required under the support order to provide health insurance coverage for a child, the obligor’s employer will, upon receipt of notice of the health insurance coverage provision, enroll the child in health insurance coverage and deduct the premiums from the obligor’s earnings in accordance with sections 2 and 3 of the Medicaid Benefits Protection Act of 1994, effective March 14, 1995 (D.C. Law 10-202; D.C. Official Code §§ 1-307.41, 1-307.42), and the Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Amendment Act of 2004, effective March 30, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-130; D.C. Official Code § 46-251.01 et seq.);
“(7) Notice that the amount and name of the obligor and obligee of all support orders entered, modified, registered, or enforced in the District after December 23, 1997 shall be reported to a consumer credit reporting agency if the obligor owes overdue support in the amount of $1,000 or more;
“(8) The name, address, and telephone number of the obligor’s current employer; and
“(9) Notice that an order to withhold may be changed upon a motion by a party or the IV-D agency for a reapportionment of periodic arrears payments pursuant to section 9(c).”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 16-42 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Child Support Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-250, April 15, 1996, 43 DCR 2131),§ 2(a) of the Child Support Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-304, July 31, 1996, 43 DCR 4474), and § 2(a) of the Child Support Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-31, March 11, 1997, 44 DCR 1904).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 7(c) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114).
For temporary addition of § 30-505.1 [1981 Ed.], see § 7(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-222, December 23, 1997, 44 DCR 114).
For temporary repeal of D.C. Law 12-103, see § 13 of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 7(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 7(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 7(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 7(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary addition of § 30-505.1 [1981 Ed.] see § 7(e) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-309, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1923), § 7(e) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-439, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 6110), § 7(e) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-503, October 27, 1998, 45 DCR 8495), and § 7(e) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-600, January 20, 1999, 46 DCR 1239).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of inclusion of social security numbers in records, see § 107(e) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-126, August 4, 1999, 46 DCR 6606).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of inclusion of social security numbers in records, see § 107(e) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-177, November 2, 1999, 46 DCR 9678).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 107(d) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90-day) authorization of inclusion of social security numbers in records, see § 107(e) of the Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-241, January 11, 2000, 47 DCR 581).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 108(d) of Child Support and Welfare Reform Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-5, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2440).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-485, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9631).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-600, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 664).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-208, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9856).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 203(b) of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-330, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1603).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3403(c) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-167, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7648).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of Income Withholding Transfer and Revision Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-200, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10490).

Emergency Legislation